New Jersey, session 221, A5089.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 3 of P.L.1990, c.61 (C.54:4-8.59) is amended to read as follows: 3.  a.  A resident of this State shall be allowed a homestead rebate or credit for the tax year equal to the amount  determined as a percentage of property taxes not in excess of $10,000 paid by the claimant in that tax year on the claimant's homestead, rounded to the nearest whole dollar, as follows: For Resident Taxpayer With Tax Year Gross Income: not over                                                                       Percentage: $100,000                                                                                 20% over $100,000 but not over $150,000                                                            15% over $150,000 but not over $250,000                                                            10% b.  (1) A resident who is 65 years of age or older at the close of the tax year, or who is allowed to claim a personal deduction as a blind or disabled taxpayer pursuant to subsection b. of N.J.S.54A:3-1, shall be allowed a homestead rebate or credit for the tax year equal to the greater of (a) the amount determined pursuant to subsection a. of this section or (b) the amount equal to an amount by which property taxes paid by the claimant in that tax year on the claimant's homestead exceed 5% of the claimant's gross income, rounded to the nearest whole dollar, but within the appropriate range, but not more than the amount of property taxes actually paid, as follows: With Tax Year Gross Income:                                  Range: not over $70,000.                                                       $1,200 to $1,000 over $70,000 but not over $125,000                                                $800 to $600 over $125,000 but not over $200,000                                                $500 (2)   Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, a homestead rebate or credit shall be allowed pursuant to this section in relation to the amount of the property taxes actually paid during the tax year for the homestead owned and occupied as such at 12:01 a.m. on October 1 of the tax year, whether paid for the entire tax year by the claimant or by any pre-October 1 owner or owners of that homestead during that tax year. c.  (1) If title to a homestead is held by more than one individual as joint tenants or tenants in common, each individual shall be allowed a homestead rebate or credit pursuant to this section only in relation to the individual's proportionate share of the property taxes assessed and levied against the homestead.  The individual's proportionate share of the property taxes on that homestead shall be equal to the share of that individual's interest in the title.  Title shall be presumed to be held in equal shares among all co-owners, but if the claimant satisfactorily demonstrates to the director that the title provides for unequal interests, either under the conveyance under which the title is held, or as otherwise may be demonstrated, that claimant's share of the property taxes paid on that homestead shall be in proportion to the claimant's interest in the title. (2)   Eligible claimants shall include individuals within any of the filing categories set forth in N.J.S.54A:2-1 and any individual or individuals not required to file a gross income tax return because their gross income was below the minimum taxable income threshold established in N.J.S.54A:2-4 and N.J.S.54A:8-3.1.  In the case of a married individual filing a separate New Jersey gross income tax return, if the spouse of the claimant maintains the same homestead as the claimant and also files a separate gross income tax return in this State the homestead rebate or credit claimed under this subsection shall be equal to one-half of the amount of the homestead rebate or credit allowable had the spouses filed a joint return and homestead rebate or credit application. (3)   An application for a homestead rebate or credit shall be allowed for a homestead the title to which is held by a partnership, to the extent of the applicant's interest as a partner therein, and by a guardian, trustee, committee, conservator or other fiduciary for any individual who would otherwise be eligible for a rebate or credit.  An application for a homestead rebate or credit shall not be allowed for a homestead, the title to which is held partially or entirely by a corporate entity of any type, except as otherwise specifically allowed for an application from a resident of a property owned by a continuing care retirement community, or a cooperative or mutual housing corporation. d.    If the homestead of a claimant is a residential property consisting of more than one unit, that claimant shall be allowed a homestead rebate or credit pursuant to this section only in relation to the proportionate share of the property taxes assessed and levied against the residential unit occupied by that claimant, as determined by the local tax assessor. e.     Nothing in this section shall preclude a co-owner, who is other than a husband or wife claiming a homestead rebate or credit on the same homestead, from receiving a homestead rebate or credit determined pursuant to this section if another co-owner claims a homestead rebate or credit pursuant to this section, provided however, that each claim for a homestead rebate or credit determined pursuant to  this section shall be separately subject to the provisions of subsections c. and d. of this section. f.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2004, c.40.) g.    (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2004, c.40.) h.    (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2007, c.62.) i.  No claimant shall be able to receive a homestead rebate or credit, or a property tax benefit under the ANCHOR Property Tax Relief Program, issued pursuant to this section or section 4 of P.L.1990, c.61 (C.54:4-8.60), if the claimant is not a resident of this State in the calendar year in which the property tax rebate, credit, or benefit is to be paid. (cf: P.L.2007, c.62, s.23) 2.  This act shall take effect on January 1 next following enactment.